src/myv-lex.txt
LEXICON TESTINGTESTING

Ыджыд TESTCOMP ;
син TESTCOMP ;
официал TESTCOMP ;
радиоактив TESTCOMP ;

LEXICON TESTCOMP

+CmpTest: # ;


!!!
!formerly Spatials_4cx
LEXICON alo-Spat
 alo-Spat-NoArg ;
 alo-Spat-1Arg ;

LEXICON alo-Spat-NoArg
+Adv+Spat+OrthPhon+Loc+Der/це:%>це kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Adv+Spat+Loc+Der/се:%>се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Adv+Spat+Der/кс:%>кс N-osh ;
+Adv+Spat+Lat:%>О1в Clitic ;
+Adv+Spat+Abl:%>дО1 Clitic ;
+Adv+Spat+Loc:%>О1 Clitic ;
+Adv+Spat+Prl:%>Г2а Clitic ;
+Adv+Spat+Loc+InDef+Der/MWN+N:%>О1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ; 
+Adv+Spat+Prl+InDef+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2а kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;

LEXICON alo-Spat-1Arg
+Po+Spat+Abl:%>дО1 kudo-Indef--Poss ;
+Po+Spat+Loc:%>О1 kudo-Indef--Poss ; 
+Po+Spat+Lat:%>О1 kudo-Possessive-Before-Clitic ;
+Po+Spat+Prl:%>Г2а kudo-Indef--Poss ;
+Po+Spat+OrthPhon+Loc+Der/це:%>це kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Po+Spat+Loc+Der/се:%>се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Po+Spat+Der/кс:%>кс N-osh ;
+Po+Spat+Lat+InDef:%>О1в Clitic ;
+Po+Spat+Abl+InDef:%>дО1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Po+Spat+Loc+InDef+Der/MWN+N:%>О1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ; 
+Po+Spat+Prl+InDef+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2а kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;

LEXICON alo-Spat-AdvN
 alo-Spat-NoArg ;
 N-kal ;
+N+Loc:%>О1 Clitic ;

LEXICON alo-Spat-PoN
 alo-Spat-1Arg ;
 N-kal ;
+N+Loc:%>О1 Clitic ;

LEXICON kovolo-Spat
+Interr+Spat+Lat+InDef:%>О1в Clitic ;
+Interr+Spat+Abl+InDef:%>дО1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Interr+Spat+Loc+InDef+Der/MWN+N:%>О1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ; 
+Interr+Spat+Prl+InDef+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2а kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Interr+Spat+Abl:%>дО1 kudo-Indef--Poss ;
+Interr+Spat+Loc:%>О1 kudo-Indef--Poss ; 
+Interr+Spat+Prl:%>Г2а kudo-Indef--Poss ;

+Rel+Spat+Lat+InDef:%>О1в Clitic ;
+Rel+Spat+Abl+InDef:%>дО1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Rel+Spat+Loc+InDef+Der/MWN+N:%>О1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ; 
+Rel+Spat+Prl+InDef+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2а kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Rel+Spat+Abl:%>дО1 kudo-Indef--Poss ;
+Rel+Spat+Loc:%>О1 kudo-Indef--Poss ; 
+Rel+Spat+Prl:%>Г2а kudo-Indef--Poss ;



LEXICON Mezty
+Assoc+Pl+Nom:%>мезть Clitic ;
+Assoc+DatCx:%>мезнень Clitic ;
+Assoc+Gen:%>мезень Clitic ;
+Assoc+Abl:%>мезде Clitic ;
+Assoc+Abe:%>мезевтеме Clitic ;
!+Assoc:%>мезть Clitic


 
LEXICON osh-Indef-DefSg-Poss
 osh--DefSg- ;
 osh-Indef--Poss ;

LEXICON osh--DefSg-
+Sg+Def:%>О1нть Clitic ;

LEXICON osh-Indef--Poss
+InDef: osh-Tenses-Obl ;
+PxSg1:%>О1нЬ2 kal-Tenses-Obl ;
+PxSg2:%>О1тЬ2 kit-Tenses-Obl ;
+PxSg3:%>О1нзО1 kudo-Tenses-Obl ;
+PxPl1:%>О1нО1к lak-Tenses-Obl ;
+PxPl2:%>О1нк lak-Tenses-Obl ;
+PxPl3:%>О1ст kit-Tenses-Obl ;

LEXICON kudo-Indef-DefSg-Poss
 kudo--DefSg- ;
 kudo-Indef--Poss ;

LEXICON kudo--DefSg-
+Sg+Def:%>О1нть Clitic ;

LEXICON kudo-Indef--Poss
+InDef: kudo-Tenses-Obl ;
+PxSg1:%>нЬ2 kal-Tenses-Obl ;
+PxSg2:%>тЬ2 kit-Tenses-Obl ;
+PxSg3:%>нзО1 kudo-Tenses-Obl ;
+PxPl1:%>нО1к lak-Tenses-Obl ;
+PxPl2:%>нк lak-Tenses-Obl ;
+PxPl3:%>ст kit-Tenses-Obl ;




! TODO: Integrate this in xml-files in working…

!LEXICON SUBSTANDARDS 
!коръя+Use/Sub:корья Noun1 ;

!! +WORK Shows up then the following LEXICA are used.

LEXICON V-ledems_ObjAll-WORK
+WORK: V-ledems_ObjAll ;

LEXICON V-kadoms_ObjAll-WORK
+WORK: V-kadoms_ObjAll ;

LEXICON V-nevtems_ObjAll-WORK
+WORK: V-nevtems_ObjAll ;

LEXICON V-savtoms_ObjAll-WORK
+WORK: V-savtoms_ObjAll ;

LEXICON V-kundams_ObjAll-WORK
+WORK: V-kundams_ObjAll ;

LEXICON V-nekshnems_ObjAll-WORK
+WORK: V-nekshnems_ObjAll ;

LEXICON V-nekshnems-WORK
+WORK: V-nekshnems ;

LEXICON V-satoms_ObjAll-WORK
+WORK: V-satoms_ObjAll ;

LEXICON V-ledems-WORK
+WORK: V-ledems ;

LEXICON V-satoms-WORK
+WORK: V-satoms ;

LEXICON V-letems-WORK
+WORK: V-letems ;

LEXICON V-kadoms-WORK
+WORK: V-kadoms ;

LEXICON V-jangavoms-WORK
+WORK: V-jangavoms ;

LEXICON V-sajevems-WORK
+WORK: V-sajevems ;

LEXICON V-nevtems-WORK
+WORK: V-nevtems ;

LEXICON V-savtoms-WORK
+WORK: V-savtoms ;

LEXICON V-kundams-WORK
+WORK: V-kundams ;

LEXICON V-tejems-WORK
+WORK: V-tejems ;

LEXICON vitj-Adj-WORK
+WORK: Adj-vitj ;

LEXICON erek-Adj-WORK
+WORK: Adj-erek ;

LEXICON od-Adj-WORK
+WORK: Adj-od ;

LEXICON vanjks-Adj-WORK
+WORK: Adj-vanjks ;

LEXICON nachko-Adj-WORK
+WORK: Adj-nachko ;

LEXICON lembe-Adj-WORK
+WORK: Adj-lembe ;

LEXICON shumbra-Adj-WORK
+WORK: Adj-shumbra ;

LEXICON kal-N-WORK
+WORK: N-kal ;

LEXICON kit-N-WORK
+WORK: N-kit ;

LEXICON lak-N-WORK
+WORK: N-lak ;

LEXICON osh-N-WORK
+WORK: N-osh ;

LEXICON pango-N-WORK
+WORK: N-pango ;

LEXICON tinge-N-WORK
+WORK: N-tinge ;

LEXICON teshte-N-WORK
+WORK: N-teshte ;

LEXICON kudo-N-WORK
+WORK: N-kudo ;
